West Virginia, session 2025, HB2989.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2j. electrical Meter choice. §24-2J-1. Legislative findings. (a) The Legislature finds that consumer choice is a fundamental aspect of the free enterprise economic system upon which our system functions.(b) The Legislature finds that many citizens have voiced concern and displeasure regarding their lack of choice regarding the type of electrical meter installed on their property by the servicing utility.(c) The Legislature finds that citizens' concerns regarding certain types of electrical meters, commonly referred to as "Smart Meters", include radiation emissions, fire risks, data security, and other concerns which have not been adequately addressed, and that these concerns bolster citizens' assertions that more choice is necessary regarding such meters. §24-2J-2. Meter choice  requirements. (a) Electrical utilities must provide customers with the option to deny installation of a "smart meter" in favor of an electrical meter which is read manually, does not contain a battery, and does not emit an electromagnetic signal.(b) Incidental electromagnetic radiation emitted by the natural process of electricity flowing through the meter as part of the electricity supplied to the customer shall not constitute an electromagnetic signal under this section.